Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2413
Nursing degree, defined.

Nursing degree means a degree or diploma in nursing from an accredited program of nursing approved by the Board of Nursing.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 828.